New Jersey, session 221, S251.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Electric and Hybrid Vehicle Battery Management Act." 2.    As used in this act: "Battery cell" means the basic electrochemical component of a battery, which provides a source of electrical energy and which consists of an assembly of a cathode, an anode, and an electrolyte. "Battery management plan" means a plan for the collection, transportation, remanufacturing, reuse, recycling and disposal, using environmentally sound management practices, of used propulsion batteries prepared pursuant to section 5 of this act. "Battery module" means an array of multiple battery cells connected in series or parallel and encased in one structure. "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Environmental Protection. "Department" means the Department of Environmental Protection. "Environmentally sound management practices" mean the policies and procedures for the collection, transportation, reuse, and recycling or disposal of used electric vehicle batteries, implemented by a producer to ensure compliance with all applicable federal, State, and local laws, rules, regulations, and ordinances, to protect human health, safety, and the environment, and to provide for the adequate recordkeeping, tracking, and documentation of the disposal of used propulsion batteries within the State. "Producer means a propulsion battery manufacturer, remanufacturer, or importer, a person who repurposes propulsion batteries, or a motor vehicle manufacturer, brand or trademark licensee, or importer, who manufactures, sells, offers for sale, or imports a propulsion battery in or into the State, as provided pursuant to subsection b. of section 5 of this act. "Propulsion battery" means an electrical energy storage device, consisting of one or more individual battery modules or battery cells, which are used to supply power to propel an electric or hybrid road vehicle.  "Propulsion battery" includes, but is not limited to, lithium-ion batteries and nickel-metal hydride batteries. "Propulsion battery" does not include a starter battery or a battery used for, or embedded in, products for industrial applications. "Recycling center" means the same as the term is defined in section 2 of P.L.1987, c.102 (C.13:1E-99.12). "Remanufacture" means any repair or modification to a propulsion battery that results in the complete battery, or any battery modules or battery cells thereof, being used for the same purpose or application as the one for which the battery was originally designed. "Repurpose" means any operation to a propulsion battery that results in the complete battery, or any battery modules or battery cells thereof, being used for a different purpose or application than the one for which the battery was originally designed. "Reuse" means the use of a propulsion battery in another vehicle of the same type, which does not require modification to the battery. "Solid waste" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-3). "Solid waste facility" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-3). "Vehicle recycler" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.2005, c.54 (C.13:1E-99.84). 3.  A propulsion battery sold in the State shall include a permanent label providing information about the battery.  Pursuant to P.L.2003, c.266 (C.26:2C-8.15), the label shall conform to the provisions of the California Low Emission Vehicle program. 4.  a.  No person shall dispose of a propulsion battery, or any battery module or battery cell thereof, as solid waste. b.  No solid waste collector registered pursuant to sections 4 and 5 of P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-4 and C.13:1E-5) and holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity pursuant to sections 7 and 10 of P.L.1970, c.40 (C.48:13A-6 and C.48:13A-9) shall knowingly collect a propulsion battery, or any module or cell thereof, placed for collection and disposal as solid waste. A solid waste collector may refuse to collect a solid waste container containing a propulsion battery, or any module or cell thereof. c.  No solid waste facility in this State shall knowingly accept for disposal a propulsion battery, or any module or cell thereof, or a truckload or roll-off container of solid waste containing a propulsion battery, or any module or cell thereof.  The owner or operator of a solid waste facility may refuse to accept for disposal a propulsion battery, or any module or cell thereof, or any truckload or roll-off container of solid waste containing a propulsion battery, or any module or cell thereof. 5.  a.  No later than 180 days after the effective date of this act, each producer of propulsion batteries sold within the State, either individually or as a part of a group of producers, shall, in consultation with the department, develop and submit a battery management plan to the department for review and approval pursuant to section 6 of this act.  The plan shall provide for producers to be responsible for the collection and management of the producers used propulsion batteries that are offered to the producer for take-back by the current battery owner. b.  A producer shall be deemed responsible for the end-of-life management of a propulsion battery pursuant to this act as follows: (1) for a propulsion battery embedded in a vehicle that is sold in the State, or sold or distributed in or into the State via remote sale or distribution: (a) if the battery is sold in a vehicle under the vehicle manufacturers own brand, the vehicle manufacturer shall be responsible for the battery; (b) if the battery is sold in a vehicle under a different brand than that of the vehicle manufacturer, the person that is the licensee of the brand or trademark under which the vehicle is sold, offered for sale, or distributed in or into the State, whether or not the trademark is registered in the State, shall be responsible for the battery; and (c) if there is no person described by subparagraphs (a) or (b) of this paragraph within the United States, the person that imports the battery-containing vehicle into the United States for sale, offering for sale, or distribution in the State shall be responsible for the battery; and (2) for a propulsion battery that is sold in the State, or sold or distributed in or into the State via remote sale or distribution, and which is not embedded in a vehicle: (a) if the battery was manufactured in the United States, and has not been remanufactured or repurposed, the battery manufacturer shall be responsible for the battery. (b) if the battery has been remanufactured or repurposed in the United States, the person that remanufactures or repurposes the battery shall be responsible for the battery, except as provided in subsection c. of this section; and (c) if there is no person described by subparagraphs (a) or (b) of this paragraph within the United States, the producer is the person that imports the battery into the United States for sale, offering for sale, or distribution in the State shall be responsible for the battery. c.  Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection b. of this section to the contrary, the original producer of a propulsion battery shall not be responsible for the management of a battery that a secondary producer has remanufactured or repurposed, unless: (1) the secondary producer is in a contractual relationship with the original producer, which provides for the retention of responsibility for the end-of-life management of the battery by the primary producer; and (2) the contract has been provided to the department as part of a battery management plan or through another means approved by the department. d.  A battery management plan prepared and submitted pursuant to this section shall include, at a minimum: (1) methods that will be used to collect and store the used propulsion batteries returned to the producer, including proposed collection services; (2) methods that will be utilized to transport used propulsion batteries to authorized recycling facilities, including the name and location of all authorized recyclers to be directly utilized pursuant to the plan; (3) processes and methods that will be utilized to remanufacture, repurpose, or recycle propulsion batteries that have reached the end of their service life, including, if necessary, a plan for final disposal of such batteries, in accordance with environmentally sound management practices; (4) a strategy for informing consumers, vehicle repair facilities, and vehicle dismantlers in the State about the requirement to properly manage propulsion batteries, the environmental impact of the improper handling or disposal of used propulsion batteries, and the mechanisms for the management of propulsion batteries that are available pursuant to the plan; (5) the means that will be used to implement and finance the battery management plan; and (6) any other information, policies, or procedures that the department deems appropriate. e.  A battery management plan shall, to the extent practicable, utilize existing recycling infrastructure. Where existing recycling infrastructure is not utilized, the electric vehicle battery management plan shall include the reasons for establishing a separate infrastructure. f.  A propulsion battery management plan shall provide for the financing of the collection, transportation, remanufacturing, reuse, recycling, or disposal of used propulsion batteries.  When a producer is required to provide for the management of used propulsion batteries, the costs of such financing shall be borne by the producer of that propulsion battery. g.  Any entity that becomes a producer after the effective date of this act shall receive approval from the department of its battery management plan prior to manufacturing, selling, offering for sale, or importing a propulsion battery in or into the State, and shall otherwise comply with the provisions of this act. h.  A battery management plan shall be reviewed and updated, as necessary, at least once every five years. 6.  a.  No later than 120 days after receipt by the department of a complete battery management plan, the department shall approve,  approve in part, or disapprove of the plan.  In making a determination pursuant to this section, the department may solicit information from producers or other stakeholders as the department deems appropriate.  The department may assess a producer a reasonable fee to cover the departments costs for plan review, program implementation, and enforcement costs pursuant to this act. b.  If the department approves the battery management plan, the producer shall implement the plan within 90 days after receipt of approval from the department or as otherwise agreed to by the department. c.  If the department approves in part the battery management plan, the department shall indicate those portions of the plan that do not comply with the requirements of this act and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.  The producer shall implement the components of the plan, as approved, within 90 days after receipt of approval by the department or as otherwise agreed to by the department, and submit a revised battery management plan within 30 days after receipt of notification of the approval in part by the department in order to bring the entire plan into compliance with the requirements of this act and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.  The department shall review and approve, conditionally approve, or disapprove a revised battery management plan within 30 days after receipt of the revised plan. d.  If the battery management plan is disapproved, the department shall inform the producer of the reasons for the disapproval.  The producer shall have 30 days thereafter to submit a revised battery management plan to the department. e.  If, at the conclusion of the time period ending 120 days after receipt by the department of a complete battery management plan, the department has not approved, approved in part, or disapproved the battery management plan pursuant to subsections b. through d. of this section, the battery management plan shall be deemed to be conditionally approved.  A producer, subject to any modifications required by the department, shall implement a conditionally approved  battery management plan within 90 days after the plan has been deemed conditionally approved by the department. f.  The department may impose additional plan requirements, at the conclusion of the time period ending 240 days after the effective date of this act for any portion of a battery management plan that does not comply with the requirements of this act, and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, for a plan component that has not been approved pursuant to this section. g.  The department may review a battery management plan approved pursuant to this section and recommend modifications thereto at any time upon a finding that the approved battery management plan, as implemented, is deficient. h.  Within 90 days after the departments approval of a battery management plan submitted in accordance with section 5 of this act, or any revisions thereto, the department shall post, at a publicly accessible location on its Internet website, each battery management plan and a list identifying each of the producers participating in a battery management plan. 7.  a.  A person seeking to discard a propulsion battery may deliver the battery or the vehicle that contains the battery to: (1)  a location designated by the producer of the battery, as specified in the producer's battery management plan; or (2) a Class D recycling center authorized to recycle electric vehicle batteries by the department. b.  No producer of propulsion batteries may refuse to recover a used propulsion battery that it has manufactured, branded, imported, or imbedded into a product in New Jersey, if the battery is collected from a location or using a mechanism designated by the producer in its battery management plan. The producer shall provide for the proper reuse, remanufacturing, repurposing, or recycling of a propulsion battery returned pursuant to this subsection. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the original producer of a propulsion battery that has been remanufactured, repurposed, branded, imported, retailed, or embedded into a product application by a secondary producer, unless the secondary producer is in a contractual relationship with the original producer pursuant to subsection c. of section 5 of this act. 8.  a.  In implementing a battery management plan approved pursuant this act, a producer shall provide consumers with educational materials related to the producer's approved battery management plan and the collection services that are available. The educational materials shall include, but need not be limited to, information identifying the end-of-life management options that are available for propulsion batteries through the battery management plan, and a notice that, in New Jersey, the costs of the services will be covered by the producer. b.  The department shall establish a means of addressing consumer complaints and a public education program to assure the widespread dissemination of information concerning the purpose of this act. 9.  a.  A violation of the provisions of this act shall be considered a violation of the "Solid Waste Management Act," P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-1 et seq.), and the commissioner shall have recourse to any of the actions or penalties provided for in section 9 of P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-9), in order to address the violation. b.  The department shall have the right to enter, at any time during normal business hours and upon presentation of appropriate credentials, the premises of a recycling center, vehicle recycler, or  producer of propulsion batteries in order to determine compliance with the provisions of this act. 10.  The Commissioner of Environmental Protection shall adopt, pursuant to the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), any rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 11.  Section 10 of this act shall take effect immediately, and the remainder of the act shall take effect on the first day of the twelfth month following enactment, except that the department may take such administrative measures as may be necessary to prepare for its timely implementation.